South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3502.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 63-7-10(A) of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (14) Legal representatives of the Department of Social Services must ensure that the child's welfare and safety are the predominant basis of all department recommendations and decisions pertaining to abuse and neglect proceedings. SECTION 2.  Section 63-7-1620(4) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (4) The interests of the State and the Department of Social Services must be represented by the legal representatives of the Department of Social Services in any judicial proceeding, who shall ensure that the child's welfare and safety are the predominant basis of any department recommendations and decisions and who shall have sole discretion on behalf of the department whether to file a child abuse or neglect petition in the family court. The attorney acting as the legal representative in a particular proceeding shall have sole discretion on behalf of the department over any decisions regarding the pursuit, settlement, or appeal of a pending action. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----